src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
+NI+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:ma' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:man EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:miwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:miniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:man EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:mishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:mishining EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:mishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:mishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:mishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:mishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:misha' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:mishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:mishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:mishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:miwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:miwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:miwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:mibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:miwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:miwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:miniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:mibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:mibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:waabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:waabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:waabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:banii' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:waabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:waabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:niban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:baniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_VVw                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_VVw_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_VVw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_VVw, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other              !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_VVw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NI+Dim+Loc:nsing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+LocDist:nsikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+ObvPl:nsa' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+ObvPl:nsan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+ObvSg:nsan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc:nzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+LocDist:nzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:nzhisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:nzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+ObvSg:nzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+ProxPl:nzhishag EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+ProxSg:nzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc:nzhishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:nsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:nsibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:nsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:nsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:nsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:nsibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:nsibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+ProxSg:nsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+ProxPl:nsag EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+ProxSg:ns EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Voc:nsidog EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc:ng EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist:kaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+ObvPl:a' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+ObvPl:an EncliticRoot ;
+NI+ObvSg:an EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc:ishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist:ishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+ObvPl:isha' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+ObvPl:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+ObvSg:ishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+ProxPl:ishag EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+ProxSg:ish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Voc:ishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl:banii' EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvPl:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg:banen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ObvSg:baniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ProxPl:baneg EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ProxPl:baniig EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+ProxSg:ban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+ProxPl:ag EncliticRoot ;
+NI+ProxSg: EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Voc:dog EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_irrCw                                        !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary
0:%>%> NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_irrCw                                        !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_irrCw                                        !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Stems
aagimaak:aagimaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
aamanamik:aamanamikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
aandeg:aandegw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
aangawamik:aangawamikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
aashimaang:aashimaangw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
abwaanamik:abwaanamikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
adik:adikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
adikameg:adikamegw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
adoopii-wanagek:adoopii-wanagekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
ajijaak:ajijaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
amik:amikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
anzig:anzigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
asiginaak:asiginaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
ayaabemik:ayaabemikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
baapaagimaak:baapaagimaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
baate-zhingwaak:baate-zhingwaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
babig:babigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
bagesaanaak:bagesaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
beshk:beshkw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
biig:biigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
gaag:gaagw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
gaaskamik:gaaskamikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
gayaashk:gayaashkw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
gekek:gekekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
gichi-amik:gichi-amikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
gichi-biig:gichi-biigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
giikanaabate-adikameg:giikanaabate-adikamegw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
maanadik:maanadikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
maanameg:maanamegw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
maang:maangw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
makadewamik:makadewamikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
mikinaak:mikinaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
miskokaadaak:miskokaadaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
miskwaawaak:miskwaawaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
mitadimoodaabaanaak:mitadimoodaabaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
mitigodaabaanaak:mitigodaabaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
mizanzig:mizanzigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
mizizaak:mizizaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
naabek:naabekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
naabekwa:naabekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
nabagidaabaanaak:nabagidaabaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
nameteg:nametegw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
nigig:nigigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
nisawaakodaabaanaak:nisawaakodaabaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
noozhek:noozhekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
odaabaanaak:odaabaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
ogaawanzig:ogaawanzigw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
ojijaak:ojijaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
okikaandagwanagek:okikaandagwanagekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
ozhibii'iganaak:ozhibii'iganaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
waabak:waabakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
waabi-maang:waabi-maangw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
waak:waakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
wanagek:wanagekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
wazhashk:wazhashkw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
wenda-zhingwaak:wenda-zhingwaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zaasagokwaanamik:zaasagokwaanamikw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zesegaandagwanagek:zesegaandagwanagekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zhigaag:zhigaagw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zhigwameg:zhigwamegw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zhingwaak:zhingwaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zhingwaakwanagek:zhingwaakwanagekw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
zhooshkodaabaanaak:zhooshkodaabaanaakw2 NA_Class=NA_irrCw_Boundary ;
